Illinois, session 104th, HB2636.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)7    Sec. 10-20.88. Junior color guard.8    (a) In this Section: 9    "Civic organization or association" includes, but is not 10limited to, a local organization or association representing 11veterans or military personnel or any other civic-minded 12community group.13    "Local resources" includes, but is not limited to, 14financial assistance, training, and equipment provided to a 15school by a civic organization or association or any local 16funds a school board expends on establishing and maintaining a 17junior color guard program.18    (b) Subject to the availability of local resources, 19beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public middle 20school, junior high school, and high school may establish a 21junior color guard program to promote the value of and honor 22military personnel. The junior color guard may be used at 23school events, including interscholastic athletic events and   HB2636- 2 -LRB104 09661 LNS 19727 b1other events in which the presenting of the colors is 2requested. Each school may allow the junior color guard to 3participate in community events in which the presenting of the 4colors may be requested. Each school may work with a civic 5organization or association to provide adequate training to 6the members of the junior color guard on the execution of their 7duties.  8    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)9    Sec. 34-18.88. Junior color guard.10    (a) In this Section: 11    "Civic organization or association" includes, but is not 12limited to, a local organization or association representing 13veterans or military personnel or any other civic-minded 14community group.15    "Local resources" includes, but is not limited to, 16financial assistance, training, and equipment provided to a 17school by a civic organization or association or any local 18funds the board expends on establishing and maintaining a 19junior color guard program.20    (b) Subject to the availability of local resources, 21beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public middle 22school, junior high school, and high school may establish a 23junior color guard program to promote the value of and honor 24military personnel. The junior color guard may be used at 25school events, including interscholastic athletic events and   HB2636- 3 -LRB104 09661 LNS 19727 b1other events in which the presenting of the colors is 2requested. Each school may allow the junior color guard to 3participate in community events in which the presenting of the 4colors may be requested. Each school may work with a civic 5organization or association to provide adequate training to 6the members of the junior color guard on the execution of their 7duties.